Utah statutes.
20A-11-403 (Superseded 01/01/11).   Failure to file -- Penalties.
(1)  Within 30 days after a deadline for the filing of a summary report, the
lieutenant governor shall review each filed summary report to ensure that:
(a)  each officeholder that is required to file a summary report has filed
one; and
(b)  each summary report contains the information required by this part.
(2)  If it appears that any officeholder has failed to file the summary report
required by law, if it appears that a filed summary report does not conform to
the law, or if the lieutenant governor has received a written complaint
alleging a violation of the law or the falsity of any summary report, the
lieutenant governor shall, within five days of discovery of a violation or
receipt of a written complaint, notify the officeholder of the violation or
written complaint and direct the officeholder to file a summary report
correcting the problem.
(3) (a)  It is unlawful for any officeholder to fail to file or amend a
summary report within 14 days after receiving notice from the lieutenant
governor under this section.
(b)  Each officeholder who violates Subsection (3)(a) is guilty of a class B
misdemeanor.
(c)  The lieutenant governor shall report all violations of Subsection (3)(a)
to the attorney general.
